el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Τροφοδοσία ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Αξεσουάρ προσαρμογέων τροφοδοσίας & φορτιστών): > Ανταλλακτικά καλώδια: Καλώδια ρεύματος φορητού υπολογιστή; Καλώδια φόρτισης smartwatch; Καλώδια ρεύματος τηλεόρασης
ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 전력 > 전원 어댑터/충전기 부대용품 > 교체용 코드: 노트북 전원 코드; 스마트워치 충전 케이블; TV 전원 코드
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > ส่งกำลัง > อะแดปเตอร์และอุปกรณ์ชาร์จไฟ > สายไฟสำรอง: สายไฟโน้ตบุ๊ก; สายชาร์จสมาร์ทวอทช์; สายไฟทีวี
hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Áram > Tápadapter- és töltőkiegészítők > Cserekábelek: Laptop-tápkábelek; Okosóra-töltőkábelek; TV-tápkábelek
tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Güç > Güç Adaptörü ve Şarj Cihazı Aksesuarları > Yedek Kablolar: Dizüstü Bilgisayar Güç Kabloları; Akıllı Saat Şarj Kabloları; TV Güç Kabloları
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Strøm > Tilbehør til strømadaptere og -ladere > Erstatningsledninger: Strømledninger til bærbar datamaskin; Smartklokke-ladekabler; TV strømledninger
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Power > Accessoires voor netspanningsadapters > Vervangingssnoeren: Laptop stroomsnoeren; Smartwatch oplaadkabels; TV stroomsnoeren
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Điện > Phụ kiện bộ chuyển đổi điện và bộ sạc > Dây thay thế: Dây nguồn laptop; Cáp sạc đồng hồ thông minh; Dây nguồn TV
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Puissance > Accessoires pour adaptateurs de courant et chargeurs > Cordons de remplacement: Cordons d’alimentation pour ordinateur portable; Câbles de charge pour montre connectée; Cordons d’alimentation pour téléviseur
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Электропитание > Аксессуары для адаптеров питания и зарядных устройств > Шнуры для адаптеров питания и зарядных устройств: Шнуры питания для ноутбуков; Зарядные кабели для умных часов; Шнуры питания для телевизоров
en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Power > Power Adapter & Charger Accessories > Replacement Cords: Laptop Power Cords; Smartwatch Charging Cables; TV Power Cords
ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > 電力 > 電源アダプター関連用品 > 交換用コード: ノートパソコン電源コード; スマートウォッチ充電ケーブル; テレビ電源コード
lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Maitinimas > Maitinimo adapterių ir įkroviklių priedai > Pakaitiniai laidai: Nešiojamojo kompiuterio maitinimo kabeliai; Išmaniųjų laikrodžių įkrovimo kabeliai; TV maitinimo laidai
es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Potencia > Accesorios para cargadores y adaptadores de corriente > Cables de repuesto: Cables de corriente de laptop; Cables de carga de smartwatch; Cables de corriente de TV
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Energia > Acessórios de adaptador de potência e carregador > Cabos de substituição: Cabos de alimentação para portátil; Cabos de carregamento para smartwatch; Cabos de alimentação para TV
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Ström > Tillbehör till strömadaptrar > Reservsnören: Nätsladdar för bärbara datorer; Laddningskablar för smartklockor; TV-nätsladdar
da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Strøm > Strømforsyning og opladertilbehør > Reserveledninger: Strømledninger til bærbare computere; Smartwatch – opladningskabler; TV-strømledninger
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Захранване > Захранващ адаптер и аксесоари за зарядно устройство > Резервни кабели: Захранващи кабели за лаптоп; Кабели за зареждане на смартчасовник; Захранващи кабели за телевизор
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Moc > Akcesoria do zasilaczy > Przewody na wymianę: Przewody zasilające do laptopa; Kable ładowania smartwatcha; Przewody zasilające do telewizora
cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > Napájení > Napájecí adaptéry a nabíječky – příslušenství > Náhradní kabely: Napájecí kabely pro notebooky; Nabíjecí kabely pro chytré hodinky; Napájecí kabely pro televize
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > Virta > Adapterit ja laturitarvikkeet > Vaihtojohdot: Kannettavan tietokoneen virtajohdot; Älykellon latauskaapelit; TV-virtajohdot
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Alimentare > Accesorii pentru adaptoare de alimentare și încărcătoare > Cabluri de schimb: Cabluri de alimentare pentru laptopuri; Cabluri de încărcare pentru ceasuri inteligente; Cabluri de alimentare pentru televizoare
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 供电设备 > 电源适配器/充电器配件 > 更换电线: 笔记本电脑电源线; 智能手表充电线; 电视电源线
hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Napajanje > Adapter napajanja i dodaci za punjače > Zamjenski kabeli: Kabeli za napajanje prijenosnog računala; Kabeli za punjenje pametnog sata; Kabeli za napajanje televizora
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Napajanje > Dodatki za napajalnike in polnilnike > Nadomestni kabli: Napajalni kabli za prenosnike; Kabli za polnjenje pametnih ur; Napajalni kabli za televizorje
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Alimentazione > Accessori per caricabatteria e adattatori di corrente > Cavi di ricambio: Cavi di alimentazione per laptop; Cavi di ricarica smartwatch; Cavi di alimentazione TV
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Leistung > Netzteil- & Ladegerätezubehör > Ersatzkabel: Laptop-Stromkabel; Smartwatch-Ladekabel; TV-Stromkabel
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > 電源 > 直流變壓器/充電器配件 > 替換電源線: 筆電電源線; 智慧手錶充電線; 電視電源線
sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Gombík napájania > Príslušenstvo pre napájací adaptér a nabíjačku > Náhradné káble: Napájacie šnúry notebookov; Nabíjacie káble inteligentných hodiniek; Napájacie šnúry televízorov
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Potente > Acessórios para adaptadores de energia > Cabos de reposição: Cabos de alimentação para notebook; Cabos de carregamento para smartwatch; Cabos de alimentação para TV